DI-475

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI3QJ-01

DTC

B0103/12 Short in D Squib Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The D squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, spiral cable and steering wheel pad.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each components, see page OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0103/12 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the D squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Short circuit in D squib wire harness (to B+) « Steering wheel pad (D squib)
¢ D squib malfunction « Spiral cable

B0103/12

* Spiral cable malfunction
* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

¢ Airbag sensor assembly
*Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-459.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)
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2 [ Check D squib circuit.
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CHECK:
(@) Connectnegative ( -)terminal cabletothe battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.

(b) Turnignition switchto ON.

For the connector (on the spiral cable side) between the
spiral cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the volt-
age between D+ and body ground.

Voltage: 0 V

H06817
NG Go to step 5.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
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(@)

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect D+ and D- of the connector
(on the spiral cable side) between the spiral cable and the
steering wheel pad.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and walit at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

(e) Check DTC.

OK:

HINT:

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 103/12is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0103/12 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check D squib.

— e

D Squib

OR%

Check Connector

H05162
ABO118 ABO0019
R13006 W02043

Cable

ACC ON

Assembly

DTC B0103/12

H06819

@

PREPARATION:
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Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the steering wheel pad connector.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 103/12is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0103/12 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace steering wheel pad.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 [ Check spiral cable.
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PREPARATION:
(@  Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnectthe connector between the airbag sensor as-
sembly andthe spiral cable.
(¢)  Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Forthe connector (onthe spiral cable side) betweenthe spiral
cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the voltage be-
tween D+ and body ground.
OK:
Voltage: 0 V

NG> Repair or replace spiral cable.

6 Check column wire harness.

Column Wire Harness
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PREPARATION:
(@  Turn ignition switch ON.
(b) Disconnect the connector between the column wire har-
ness and airbag sensor assembly.
CHECK:
For the connector (on the column wire harness) between the
column wire harness and spiral cable, measure the voltage be-
tween D+ andbody ground.
OK:
Voltage: 0 V

NG> Repair or replace column wire harness.
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7 | Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and column wire harness.

Column Wire Harness CHECK: o )
(@)  Turn ignition switch ON.
. Aitbag (b)  For the connector (on the column wire harness side) be-
ulll= ggll;?el ] (] []sensor tween the airbag sensor assembly and the column wire
D Squib Assembly harness, measure the voltage between D+ and body
{} ground.
OK:
Voltage: 0 V
HO05165 —
H02146 ABO119 B H06822
NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween airbag sensor assembly and column wire
harness.
OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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